Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1269.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 203 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, is amended to 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829 read:Section 203. Advisory Boards and Commissions.--The following advisory boards and commissions are placed in and made parts of the respective administrative departments, as follows:In the Department of Military Affairs,State Military Reservation Commission,In the Department of Environmental Protection,Citizens Advisory Council;In the Department of Health,Advisory Health Board[;],Brain Injury Advisory Board;In the Department of Labor and Industry,Advisory Council on Affairs of the Handicapped,Advisory Board on Problems of Older Workers,Policy, Planning and Evaluation Advisory Committee;In the Department of [Public Welfare] HUMAN SERVICES,State Board of [Public Welfare] HUMAN SERVICES,Advisory Committee for the Blind,Advisory Committee for General and Special Hospitals,Advisory Committee for Children and Youth,Advisory Committee for Public Assistance,Advisory Committee for Mental Health and Mental Retardation.Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 2126.1. Brain Injury Advisory Board.--( a) The Brain Injury Advisory Board is established within the Department of Health.(b) The advisory board shall consist of twenty-five TWENTY- ONE voting members appointed by the Governor. Members of the advisory board shall consist of all of REPRESENTATIVES OF EACH 20250HB1269PN1649 - 2 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 OF the following: (1) Family members OR CAREGIVERS of brain injury survivors. (2) Individuals living with brain injury.(3) Individuals from Statewide associations that promote the rights of individuals with disabilities or represent rehabilitation facilities or individuals with brain injuries.(4) Individuals from Statewide or community-based organizations that provide brain injury services or advocacy.(5) Individuals from Statewide or community-based organizations involved with injury control or injury prevention programs.(6) Veterans who have been diagnosed with brain injury.(7) Individuals from public and nonprofit private health-related organizations.(c) The advisory board shall consist of ad hoc, nonvoting members. One ad hoc, nonvoting member shall be appointed by each of the following:(1) The Secretary of Aging or the secretary's designee.(2) The Secretary of Corrections or the secretary's designee.(3) The Secretary of Education or the secretary's designee.(4) The Secretary of Health or the secretary's designee.(5) The Secretary of Human Services or the secretary's designee.(6) The Secretary of Labor and Industry or the secretary's designee.(7) The Secretary of Military and Veterans Affairs or the secretary's designee.(8) The Insurance Commissioner or the commissioner's designee.20250HB1269PN1649 - 3 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (C) THE ADVISORY BOARD SHALL CONSIST OF AD HOC, NONVOTING MEMBERS. ONE AD HOC, NONVOTING MEMBER SHALL BE AN EMPLOYEE OF EACH OF THE FOLLOWING COMMONWEALTH AGENCIES, APPOINTED BY THE HEAD OF EACH RESPECTIVE AGENCY:(1) T HE DEPARTMENT OF AGING. (2) T HE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS. (3) THE DEPARTMENT OF DRUG AND ALCOHOL PROGRAMS.(4) THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION.(5) THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH.(6) THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES.(7) THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRY.(8) THE DEPARTMENT OF MILITARY AND VETERANS AFFAIRS.(9) THE INSURANCE DEPARTMENT.(d) The term of office of each voting member of the advisory board under subsection (b) shall be four years from the time of appointment or until the voting member's successor has been appointed, but shall not extend one hundred eighty days beyond the four-year period. THERE SHALL BE NO TERM LIMITS. (e) A vacancy in the voting membership of the advisory board under subsection (b) shall be filled for the balance of an unexpired term in the same manner as the original appointment.(f) Members of the advisory board shall serve without compensation but shall be entitled to reimbursement for travel and other actual expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.(g) The Governor shall designate different voting members of the advisory board under subsection (b) as chair, vice chair and secretary of the advisory board. A voting member may not serve more than one term in the same office specified under this subsection . SO LONG AS ONE FOUR-YEAR TERM HAS ELAPSED BETWEEN 20250HB1269PN1649 - 4 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SERVICE IN THE SAME OFFICE.(h) The advisory board shall meet publicly at least four times a year at a time and place determined by the advisory board, which may include virtual meetings.(i) The Secretary of Health shall publicize meetings of the advisory board by transmitting a notice to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(j) The Department of Health shall provide staff support to the advisory board as determined by the Secretary of Health.(k) Notwithstanding any provision of this section, a member who is serving on the Brain Injury Advisory Board on the effective date of this section established in 2001 by the Secretary of Health as required under 42 U.S.C. § 300d-52 (relating to State grants for projects regarding traumatic brain injury) may complete the member's term on the advisory board established under subsection (a).(l) The advisory board shall have the following duties:(1) Advise the Governor and the departments represented on the advisory board in the determination of service and support needs of individuals with brain injury and the implementation of services to those individuals and their families.(2) Make recommendations regarding future activities to be placed in the brain injury State Action Plan with the goal of improving access to brain injury services in this Commonwealth through information and education.(3) Apply for grants made available for projects regarding brain injury, including the Health Resources and Services Administration Federal Traumatic Brain Injury Planning Grant under 42 U.S.C. § 300d-52 or successor grant program. The 20250HB1269PN1649 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Department of Health shall provide the necessary resources for applying for a grant under this paragraph, including serving as the applicant for a grant if a State agency applicant is required.(4) Encourage citizen participation through the establishment of public hearings and other types of community outreach programs.(5) Issue an annual report regarding all of the following:(i) Brain injury data.(ii) Funding from all sources received for brain injury programs and educational materials.(iii) Required State matching funds needed to apply for and obtain non-State funded grants.(iv) Other information that advances the goals of brain injury programs and the advisory board.(m) As used in this section, the term "brain injury" includes a traumatic brain injury or nontraumatic brain injury.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 180 days.20250HB1269PN1649 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718